Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.065

Classification and numbering system of school districts.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction is responsible for the classification and numbering system of school districts.

(2) Any school district in the state that has a student enrollment in its public schools of two thousand pupils or more, as shown by evidence acceptable to the educational service district superintendent and the superintendent of public instruction, is a school district of the first class. Any other school district is a school district of the second class.

(3) Whenever the educational service district superintendent finds that the classification of a school district should be changed, and upon the approval of the superintendent of public instruction, the educational service district superintendent shall make an order in conformity with his or her findings and alter the records of his or her office accordingly. Thereafter, the board of directors of the district shall organize in the manner provided by law for the organization of the board of a district of the class to which the district then belongs.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 43, Laws of 1975, the educational service district superintendent, with the concurrence of the superintendent of public instruction, may delay approval of a change in classification of any school district for a period not exceeding three years when, in fact, the student enrollment of the district within any such time period does not exceed ten percent, either in a decrease or increase thereof.

[ 1999 c 315 s 202.]